Nebraska, session 109, LB1045.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1045 LB1045
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 15 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Nebraska Public Housing Preservation Trust Act.
Sec. 2. (1) The Legislature finds and declares that:
(a) Nebraska's public housing stock faces significant deferred
maintenance, environmental hazards, and capital-repair needs that exceed
existing federal and local capacity;
(b) Traditional federal funding streams, including section 9
operating and capital funds, have been insufficient to maintain safe,
decent, and sanitary conditions for residents;
(c) A new public financing mechanism is needed to preserve
affordability, prevent displacement, and modernize aging public housing
infrastructure while maintaining public ownership and resident control;
and
(d) The Nebraska Public Housing Preservation Trust is being created
to provide a stable funding model for public housing, ensure long-term
public ownership, and guarantee tenant protections while enabling large-
scale rehabilitation and modernization in addition to current federal
funding.
(2) The Legislature further finds and declares that:
(a) The assets of the Nebraska Public Housing Preservation Trust
constitute public trust property held for essential governmental
purposes, including housing stability, public health, and displacement
prevention;
(b) The restrictions imposed by the Nebraska Public Housing
Preservation Trust Act constitute permissible conditions on public
property and do not create compensable property interests in favor of
private parties; and
(c) No action taken pursuant to the act shall be construed as a
taking under the Fifth Amendment to the United States Constitution or
under Article I, section 21, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Nebraska Public Housing Preservation
-2-

LB1045 LB1045
2026 2026
Trust Act:
(1) Board means the board of trustees of the trust;
(2) Development means any public housing project owned or operated
by a local housing agency;
(3) Local housing agency has the same meaning as in section 71-1575;
(4) Preservation conversion means a transfer of operational
authority and financing structure from section 9 funding to project-based
section 8 funding or successor funding streams through the trust;
(5) Resident council means a democratically elected council
representing residents of a specific development;
(6) Section 8 means section 8 of the United States Housing Act of
1937, 42 U.S.C. 1437f;
(7) Section 9 means section 9 of the United States Housing Act of
1937, 42 U.S.C. 1437g; and
(8) Trust means the Nebraska Public Housing Preservation Trust
created under section 4 of this act.
Sec. 4. (1) The Nebraska Public Housing Preservation Trust is
created as a public corporation and political subdivision of the State of
Nebraska. The trust shall serve as a financing and rehabilitation entity
and shall oversee major capital improvement projects for developments.
(2) The trust shall be governed by a nine-member board of trustees.
Members of the board shall be appointed by the Governor and shall
include:
(a) Three residents of developments;
(b) One representative of a neighborhood alliance association;
(c) One executive director of a local housing agency;
(d) One representative of local housing agency employees;
(e) One member with experience in affordable housing finance;
(f) One representative of community-based nonprofit organizations;
and
(g) One representative of municipalities.
-3-

LB1045 LB1045
2026 2026
(3) The term of each member of the board shall be four years, except
at initial appointment when the terms shall be staggered so that no more
than three members shall have terms that end in any given year.
(4) All real property, leasehold interests, revenues, bond proceeds,
contract rights, and other assets held by the trust are irrevocably
dedicated to public purposes, including the preservation, rehabilitation,
and long-term public ownership of public housing for low-income
residents.
(5) Members of the board shall be deemed fiduciaries and shall owe
duties of loyalty, care, and obedience to the public purposes of the
trust and to the residents of developments that are subject to the
Nebraska Public Housing Preservation Trust Act. In the event of a
conflict between financial considerations and the health, safety, or
housing stability of residents of such developments, the interests of the
residents shall control.
(6) In the event the trust is repealed or otherwise ceases to exist,
all assets of the trust shall automatically and irrevocably transfer to a
successor public entity or resident-controlled public trust with a
substantially similar public purpose. Under no circumstances shall trust
assets revert to the state, be sold, transferred, or conveyed to a
private entity, or be used for non-housing purposes.
Sec. 5. (1)(a) No later than January 1, 2027, the trust shall enter
into an agreement with each local housing agency that wishes to
participate in the Nebraska Public Housing Preservation Trust Act. The
agreement shall address and clearly define:
(i) The specific public housing properties and assets subject to the
agreement;
(ii) The respective powers of the trust and local housing agency
regarding financial decisions, capital improvements, and operational
management;
(iii) Procedures for coordinated planning and implementation of
-4-

LB1045 LB1045
2026 2026
preservation activities;
(iv) Protocols for resident engagement and participation in
decision-making;
(v) Financial obligations and resource allocation between the
parties;
(vi) Reporting requirements and information-sharing protocols;
(vii) Staffing responsibilities and personnel management; and
(viii) Compliance with federal, state, and local laws and
regulations.
(b) The agreement shall be approved by a majority vote of the
trust's board and the governing body of the local housing agency.
(c) No agreement shall be valid or enforceable without written
certification that residents of the local housing agency's developments
have been meaningfully consulted during the development of the agreement.
(d) Each agreement shall be filed with the Department of Economic
Development within thirty days after its execution.
(2) Once an agreement has been signed with a local housing agency
under subsection (1) of this section, the trust shall have the power to:
(a) Issue bonds to finance the rehabilitation and modernization of
the local housing agency's developments;
(b) Enter into long-term ground leases of up to ninety-nine years,
provided that such leases shall not be transferable or assignable to a
private entity and shall retain permanent public ownership of the
underlying land and improvements;
(c) Apply for and receive federal tenant protection vouchers or
successor funding from the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development with respect to the local housing agency's developments; and
(d) Require development-level capital improvement plans for the
local housing agency's developments, subject to approval by the
applicable resident council.
Sec. 6. The trust shall not:
-5-

LB1045 LB1045
2026 2026
(1) Privatize property management or transfer operations to private
corporations without the approval of a majority of the residents of the
affected development; or
(2) Sell, transfer, or securitize any real property.
Sec. 7. No development that is subject to an agreement under
section 5 of this act and no asset, revenue stream, or contractual
interest held by the trust shall be subject to receivership, foreclosure,
bankruptcy proceedings, or involuntary transfer. In the event of
financial distress with respect to any of the trust's capital improvement
projects, the sole remedy available shall be a corrective action plan
approved by the board and any affected resident council.
Sec. 8. (1) The following shall apply to any development that is
subject to an agreement under section 5 of this act and that has
undergone a preservation conversion:
(a) Rent shall be capped at thirty percent of the resident's
household income;
(b) Residents shall have the right to return to the development if
temporary relocation is required for safety or construction;
(c) Residents shall only be evicted for just cause, and any
residents who are evicted shall have access to expedited grievance
procedures; and
(d) Residents shall not be subject to income discrimination, lease
changes, or service reductions due to the conversion.
(2) No contract, bond covenant, or intergovernmental agreement shall
be enforceable if it materially impairs the resident protections provided
in this section.
Sec. 9. Any development that is subject to an agreement under
section 5 of this act and that has undergone a preservation conversion
shall establish a resident council. The resident council shall have the
power to:
(1) Approve annual capital improvement plans;
-6-

LB1045 LB1045
2026 2026
(2) Review maintenance budget allocations;
(3) Participate in contractor selection;
(4) Deny private management proposals; and
(5) Review and approve performance metrics.
Sec. 10. (1) The trust shall create a website containing the
following information with respect to developments that are subject to an
agreement under section 5 of this act:
(a) Work orders;
(b) Resident complaints and outcomes;
(c) Construction timelines;
(d) Capital expenditures;
(e) Contractor performance;
(f) Eviction data; and
(g) Resident satisfaction metrics.
(2) The trust shall submit quarterly reports on its activities to
the Legislature and to each resident council. The reports submitted to
the Legislature shall be submitted electronically.
Sec. 11. (1) The trust shall adopt local hiring standards that
apply to construction projects involving developments that are subject to
an agreement under section 5 of this act. Such hiring standards shall
require that:
(a) At least thirty-five percent of the labor hours be performed by
public housing residents; and
(b) An additional thirty percent of the labor hours be performed by
businesses located in low-income neighborhoods in the relevant community.
(2) Each construction project involving a development that is
subject to an agreement under section 5 of this act shall include a
community benefits agreement with commitments regarding:
(a) Job training;
(b) Youth programs;
(c) Onsite community services;
-7-

LB1045 LB1045
2026 2026
(d) Environmental improvements;
(e) Use of minority-owned and women-owned businesses; and
(f) Neighborhood stabilization initiatives.
Sec. 12. (1) Bonds issued by the trust shall be backed by:
(a) Project-based federal vouchers;
(b) Contributions from the municipality or county in which the
development is located; or
(c) Funds available in the Public Housing Capital Stabilization
Fund.
(2) The Public Housing Capital Stabilization Fund is created. The
fund shall be administered by the trust and shall include money received
from private donations and federal grants. Any money in the fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
(3) Bond proceeds shall be used for capital improvements for
developments that are subject to an agreement under section 5 of this
act.
Sec. 13. The trust may undertake the preservation conversion of
developments subject to an agreement under section 5 of this act in
phases of five thousand units, contingent upon:
(1) Positive annual evaluations from the Auditor of Public Accounts;
(2) Stable financial performance;
(3) No increase in eviction rates;
(4) Resident satisfaction above a defined threshold set by the
trust; and
(5) Compliance with the requirements of section 8 of this act.
Sec. 14. If the conditions within any development that is subject
to an agreement under section 5 of this act pose an imminent threat to
the health and safety of the residents of such development, the trust may
enter into emergency contracts with contractors to address such
-8-

LB1045 LB1045
2026 2026
conditions without the need to follow the procurement procedures that
would otherwise be applicable.
Sec. 15. Any affected resident council or any group of not fewer
than ten affected residents shall have standing to bring an action for
injunctive or declaratory relief to enforce the provisions of the
Nebraska Public Housing Preservation Trust Act.
Sec. 16. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 17. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-9-